Utah statutes.
63L-1-201.   Jurisdiction over land acquired by United States -- Reservations by state -- Duration of jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction is hereby ceded to the United States in, to and over any and all lands or territory within this state which have heretofore been acquired by the United States by purchase, condemnation or otherwise for military or naval purposes and for forts, magazines, arsenals, dockyards and other needful buildings of every kind whenever authorized by Act of Congress, and in, to and over any and all lands or territory within this state now held by the United States under lease, use permit, or reserved from the public domain for any of the purposes aforesaid; this state, however, reserving the right to execute its process, both criminal and civil, within such territory.  The jurisdiction so ceded shall continue so long as the United States shall own, hold or reserve land for any of the aforesaid purposes, or in connection therewith, and no longer.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

